test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kulkkiija_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kulkkiija - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Nom: kulkkiija
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Gen: kulkkiijan
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Par: kulkkiijaa
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Tra: kulkkiijaksi
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Abe: kulkkiijatta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ine: kulkkiijassa
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ela: kulkkiijasta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ill: kulkkiijhaan
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ade: kulkkiijalla
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Abl: kulkkiijalta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+All: kulkkiijalle
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ess: kulkkiijanna
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Nom: kulkkiijat
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Gen: kulkkiijoitten
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Par: kulkkiijoita
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Tra: kulkkiijoiksi
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Abe: kulkkiijoitta
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ine: kulkkiijoissa
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ela: kulkkiijoista
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ill: kulkkiijhoin
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ade: kulkkiijoilla
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Abl: kulkkiijoilta
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+All: kulkkiijoille
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ess: kulkkiijoinna
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Com: kulkkiijoine
